District of Columbia statutes.
4-120

Duties of Trustees of National Training School for Girls transferred.

The duties prior to March 16, 1926, imposed by law upon the Board of Trustees of the National Training School for Girls concerning the admission, care, parole, and discharge of inmates shall be vested in the Board.

Mar. 16, 1926, 44 Stat. 210, ch. 58, § 12
1981 Ed., § 3-121.
1973 Ed., § 3-122.

Board of Public Welfare abolished: See note to § 4-102.

Statutory provisions for the National Training School for Girls were formerly codified in D.C. Code, §§ 32-901 to 32-913. These provisions were omitted from codification as obsolete in the 1973 Edition of the D.C. Code in light of the Act of August 3, 1951, 62 Stat. 154, ch. 291, § 1, which provided that no new commitments to the School should be made after August 3, 1951.